District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.88

Repealed

Involuntary dissolution.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 216, ch. 269, § 88
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.88.
1981 Ed., § 29-388.
1973 Ed., § 29-931.